Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 5. In-State Tuition and Reduced Rate Tuition Eligibility.

§ 23.1-500.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Date of the alleged entitlement”
means the first official day of class within the term, semester, or quarter of the program of study in which a student is enrolled.

“Dependent student”
means a student who is listed as a dependent on the federal or state income tax return of his parents or legal guardian or who receives substantial financial support from his spouse, parent, or legal guardian. “Dependent student” includes unemancipated minors.

“Domicile”
means the present, fixed home of an individual to which he returns following temporary absences and at which he intends to stay indefinitely. No individual may have more than one domicile at a time. Domicile, once established, is not affected by (i) mere transient or temporary physical presence outside the Commonwealth or (ii) the establishment and maintenance of a place of residence outside the Commonwealth for the purpose of maintaining a joint household with an active duty United States military spouse.

“Domiciliary intent”
means present intent to remain indefinitely.

“Emancipated minor”
means a minor student who has been emancipated pursuant to Article 15 (§ 16.1-331 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1 or the applicable laws of any other jurisdiction.

“Employed full time”
means employed in a position resulting in at least an annual earned income reported for tax purposes equivalent to 50 work weeks of 40 hours at minimum wage.

“Independent student”
means a student whose parents have surrendered the right to his care, custody, and earnings; do not claim him as a dependent on federal or state income tax returns; and have ceased to provide him with substantial financial support. “Independent student” includes emancipated minors.

“Substantial financial support”
means any amount of financial support received by a student that qualifies him to be listed as a dependent on federal and state income tax returns.

“Surviving spouse”
means the spouse of a military service member who, while serving as an active duty member in the Armed Forces of the United States, Reserves of the Armed Forces of the United States, or Virginia National Guard, during military operations against terrorism, on a peacekeeping mission, or as a result of a terrorist act, or in any armed conflict, was killed in action, became missing in action, or became a prisoner of war.

“Unemancipated minor”
means a minor student who has not been emancipated pursuant to Article 15 (§ 16.1-331 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 16.1 or the applicable laws of any other jurisdiction.

“Veteran”
means an individual who has served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States and who was discharged or released from such service under conditions other than dishonorable.

“Virginia employer”
means (i) any employing unit organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or having income from sources in the Commonwealth regardless of its organizational structure or (ii) any public or nonprofit organization authorized to operate in the Commonwealth.

History.

1984, c. 422, § 23-7.4; 1985, cc. 179, 572; 1988, c. 124; 1989, c. 371; 1990, c. 680; 1991, c. 590; 1996, cc. 931, 981; 1999, c. 439; 2006, cc. 783, 797, 806; 2007, cc. 108, 491; 2008, c. 723; 2011, cc. 38, 44, 782, 860; 2013, cc. 139, 166, 243; 2014, c. 341; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 12, cl. 1 repealed Acts 1988, c. 124, cl. 2, which had provided that the amendments included in c. 124 would expire on July 1, 1993, and that the law would continue in force as it existed prior to July 1, 1988.

§ 23.1-501.
Presumption of dependency for certain students.

It shall be presumed that a student under the age of 24 on the date of the alleged entitlement receives substantial financial support from his parent or legal guardian and is therefore the dependent of his parent or legal guardian unless the student (i) is a veteran or an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, (ii) is a graduate or professional student, (iii) is married, (iv) is a ward of the court or was a ward of the court until age 18, (v) has no adoptive parent or legal guardian and each of the student’s parents is deceased, (vi) has legal dependents other than a spouse, or (vii) is able to present clear and convincing evidence that he is financially self-sufficient.

History.

1984, c. 422, § 23-7.4; 1985, cc. 179, 572; 1988, c. 124; 1989, c. 371; 1990, c. 680; 1991, c. 590; 1996, cc. 931, 981; 1999, c. 439; 2006, cc. 783, 797, 806; 2007, cc. 108, 491; 2008, c. 723; 2011, cc. 38, 44, 782, 860; 2013, cc. 139, 166, 243; 2014, c. 341; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 12, cl. 1 repealed Acts 1988, c. 124, cl. 2, which had provided that the amendments included in c. 124 would expire on July 1, 1993, and that the law would continue in force as it existed prior to July 1, 1988.

§ 23.1-502.
Eligibility for in-state tuition charges; domicile; domiciliary intent.

To be eligible for in-state tuition at public institutions of higher education, an independent student or, in the case of a dependent student, the individual through whom he claims eligibility, shall establish by clear and convincing evidence (i) domicile in the Commonwealth for a period of at least one year immediately succeeding the establishment of domiciliary intent pursuant to subsection B and immediately prior to the date of the alleged entitlement and (ii) the abandonment of any previous domicile, if such existed. No institution of higher education shall give weight to any evidence that such student or individual presents in support of his claim for domicile or the abandonment of any previous domicile unless such evidence has existed for a period of at least one year immediately prior to the date of the alleged entitlement. If the individual through whom a dependent student establishes domicile and eligibility for in-state tuition charges abandons his domicile in the Commonwealth, such student is entitled to in-state tuition charges for one year from the date of such abandonment.

To establish domicile, an independent student or, in the case of a dependent student, the individual through whom he claims eligibility, shall establish by clear and convincing evidence domiciliary intent. In determining domiciliary intent, institutions of higher education shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including the following applicable factors: continuous residence for at least one year prior to the date of the alleged entitlement, except in the event of the establishment and maintenance of a place of residence outside the Commonwealth for the purpose of maintaining a joint household with an active duty United States military spouse; state to which income taxes are filed or paid; driver’s license; motor vehicle registration; voter registration; employment; property ownership; sources of financial support; military records; a written offer and acceptance of employment following graduation; and any other social or economic relationships within and outside the Commonwealth.

History.

1984, c. 422, § 23-7.4; 1985, cc. 179, 572; 1988, c. 124; 1989, c. 371; 1990, c. 680; 1991, c. 590; 1996, cc. 931, 981; 1999, c. 439; 2006, cc. 783, 797, 806; 2007, cc. 108, 491; 2008, c. 723; 2011, cc. 38, 44, 782, 860; 2013, cc. 139, 166, 243; 2014, c. 341; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 12, cl. 1 repealed Acts 1988, c. 124, cl. 2, which had provided that the amendments included in c. 124 would expire on July 1, 1993, and that the law would continue in force as it existed prior to July 1, 1988.

§ 23.1-503.
Determination of domicile; rules; presumptions.

Students shall not ordinarily establish domicile by the performance of acts that are auxiliary to fulfilling educational objectives or are required or routinely performed by temporary residents of the Commonwealth. Students shall not establish domicile by mere physical presence or residence primarily for educational purposes.

A married individual may establish domicile in the same manner as an unmarried individual.

A nonmilitary student whose parent or spouse is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States may establish domicile in the same manner as any other student.

Any alien holding an immigration visa or classified as a political refugee may establish domicile in the same manner as any other student. However, absent congressional intent to the contrary, any individual holding a student visa or another temporary visa does not have the capacity to intend to remain in the Commonwealth indefinitely and is therefore ineligible to establish domicile and receive in-state tuition charges.

The domicile of a dependent student shall be rebuttably presumed to be the domicile of the parent or legal guardian (i) claiming him as an exemption on federal or state income tax returns currently and for the tax year prior to the date of the alleged entitlement or (ii) providing him with substantial financial support. The spouse of an active duty military service member, if such spouse has established domicile and claimed the dependent student on federal or state income tax returns, is not subject to minimum income tests or requirements.

The domicile of an unemancipated minor or a dependent student 18 years old or older may be the domicile of either the parent with whom he resides, the parent who claims the student as a dependent for federal or Virginia income tax purposes for the tax year prior to the date of the alleged entitlement and is currently so claiming the student, or the parent who provides the student with substantial financial support. If there is no surviving parent or the whereabouts of the parents are unknown, then the domicile of an unemancipated minor shall be the domicile of the legal guardian of such unemancipated minor unless circumstances indicate that such guardianship was created primarily for the purpose of establishing domicile.

Continuously enrolled non-Virginia students shall be presumed to be in the Commonwealth for educational purposes unless they rebut such presumption with clear and convincing evidence of domicile.

A non-Virginia student is not eligible for reclassification as a Virginia student unless he applies for and is approved for such reclassification. Any such reclassification shall only be granted prospectively from the date such application is received.

A student who knowingly provides erroneous information in an attempt to evade payment of out-of-state tuition charges shall be charged out-of-state tuition for each term, semester, or quarter attended and may be subject to dismissal from the institution. All disputes relating to the veracity of information provided to establish domicile in the Commonwealth are appealable as set forth in §

23.1-510

.

No student shall be deemed ineligible to establish domicile and receive in-state tuition charges solely on the basis of the immigration status of his parent.

History.

1984, c. 422, § 23-7.4; 1985, cc. 179, 572; 1988, c. 124; 1989, c. 371; 1990, c. 680; 1991, c. 590; 1996, cc. 931, 981; 1999, c. 439; 2006, cc. 783, 797, 806; 2007, cc. 108, 491; 2008, c. 723; 2011, cc. 38, 44, 782, 860; 2013, cc. 139, 166, 243; 2014, c. 341; 2016, c. 588; 2020, c. 512.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 12, cl. 1 repealed Acts 1988, c. 124, cl. 2, which had provided that the amendments included in c. 124 would expire on July 1, 1993, and that the law would continue in force as it existed prior to July 1, 1988.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 512 added subsection J.

§ 23.1-504.
Determination of domicile; exception; certain active duty and retired military personnel, etc.

In determining the domicile of (i) active duty military personnel residing in the Commonwealth, retired military personnel residing in the Commonwealth at the time of their retirement, surviving spouses, or veterans who voluntarily elect to establish the Commonwealth as their permanent residence for the purpose of domicile or (ii) a dependent spouse or dependent child who claims domicile through an individual listed in clause (i), institutions of higher education shall waive the one-year requirement set forth in subsection B of §

23.1-502

.

History.

1984, c. 422, § 23-7.4; 1985, cc. 179, 572; 1988, c. 124; 1989, c. 371; 1990, c. 680; 1991, c. 590; 1996, cc. 931, 981; 1999, c. 439; 2006, cc. 783, 797, 806; 2007, cc. 108, 491; 2008, c. 723; 2011, cc. 38, 44, 782, 860; 2013, cc. 139, 166, 243; 2014, c. 341; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 12, cl. 1 repealed Acts 1988, c. 124, cl. 2, which had provided that the amendments included in c. 124 would expire on July 1, 1993, and that the law would continue in force as it existed prior to July 1, 1988.

§ 23.1-505.
Determination of domicile; exception; dependents of certain active duty military personnel, etc.

For the purposes of this section:“Date of alleged entitlement” means the date of admission or acceptance for dependents currently residing in the Commonwealth or the final add/drop date for dependents of members newly transferred to the Commonwealth.“Temporarily mobilized” means activated for service for 180 days or more.“Unaccompanied orders” means orders that assign active duty military personnel or activated or temporarily mobilized reserve or guard members an unaccompanied tour listed in Appendix Q of the Joint Federal Travel Regulations.

Notwithstanding §

23.1-502

or any other provision of law to the contrary, all dependents, as defined by 37 U.S.C. § 401, of active duty military personnel or activated or temporarily mobilized reservists or guard members (i) assigned to a permanent duty station or workplace in the Commonwealth, the District of Columbia, or a state contiguous to the Commonwealth who reside in the Commonwealth; (ii) assigned unaccompanied orders and immediately prior to receiving such unaccompanied orders were assigned to a permanent duty station or workplace in the Commonwealth, the District of Columbia, or a state contiguous to the Commonwealth and resided in the Commonwealth; or (iii) assigned unaccompanied orders with the Commonwealth listed as the designated place move shall be deemed to be domiciled in the Commonwealth and are eligible to receive in-state tuition.

All such dependents shall be afforded the same educational benefits as any other individual who is eligible for in-state tuition pursuant to §

23.1-502

. Such dependents are eligible for such benefits, including in-state tuition status, for as long as they are continuously enrolled in a public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education or have transferred between public institutions of higher education or private institutions of higher education or from an undergraduate degree program to a graduate degree program at a public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education, regardless of any change of duty station or residence of the military service member. Such continuous enrollment requirement shall be waived if the dependent verifies that a break of no longer than one year was required in order to support a spouse or parent on orders for a change of duty assignment or location.

History.

1984, c. 422, § 23-7.4; 1985, cc. 179, 572; 1988, c. 124; 1989, c. 371; 1990, c. 680; 1991, c. 590; 1996, cc. 931, 981; 1999, c. 439; 2006, cc. 783, 797, 806; 2007, cc. 108, 491; 2008, c. 723; 2011, cc. 38, 44, 782, 860; 2013, cc. 139, 166, 243; 2014, c. 341; 2016, c. 588; 2020, c. 382.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 12, cl. 1 repealed Acts 1988, c. 124, cl. 2, which had provided that the amendments included in c. 124 would expire on July 1, 1993, and that the law would continue in force as it existed prior to July 1, 1988.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 382 added the last sentence of subsection C.

§ 23.1-505.1.
(Effective August 1, 2022) Eligibility for in-state tuition and state financial assistance programs.

Notwithstanding §

23.1-502

or any other provision of law to the contrary, any student who (i) attended high school for at least two years in the Commonwealth and either (a) graduated on or after July 1, 2008, from a public or private high school or program of home instruction in the Commonwealth or (b) passed on or after July 1, 2008, a high school equivalency examination approved by the Secretary of Education; (ii) has submitted evidence that he or, in the case of a dependent student, at least one parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis has filed, unless exempted by state law, Virginia income tax returns for at least two years prior to the date of registration or enrollment; and (iii) registers as an entering student or is enrolled in a public institution of higher education or private institution of higher education in the Commonwealth, is eligible for in-state tuition regardless of citizenship or immigration status, except that students with currently valid visas issued under 8 U.S.C. § 1101(a)(15)(F), 1101(a)(15)(H)(iii), 1101(a)(15)(J)(including only students or trainees), or 1101(a)(15)(M) are not eligible. All such students shall be afforded the same educational benefits, including access to financial assistance programs administered by the Council, the State Board, or a public institution of higher education, as any other individual who is eligible for in-state tuition pursuant to §

23.1-502

. Information obtained in the implementation of this section shall only be used or disclosed to individuals other than the student for purposes of determining such educational benefits.

Any non-Virginia student granted in-state tuition pursuant to this section shall be counted as a Virginia student for the purposes of determining college admissions, enrollment, and tuition and fee revenue policies.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 107, 108.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 107 and
108, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on August 1, 2022.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 107 and
108, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia, in coordination with institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth, shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

§ 23.1-506.
(Effective August 1, 2022) Eligibility for in-state tuition; exception; certain out-of-state and high school students.

Notwithstanding §

23.1-502

or any other provision of law to the contrary, the following students are eligible for in-state tuition charges regardless of domicile:

Any non-Virginia student who resides outside the Commonwealth and has been employed full time in the Commonwealth for at least one year immediately prior to the date of the alleged entitlement if such student has paid Virginia income taxes on all taxable income earned in the Commonwealth for the tax year prior to the date of the alleged entitlement. Such student shall continue to be eligible for in-state tuition charges for so long as the student is employed full time in the Commonwealth and the student pays Virginia income taxes on all taxable income earned in the Commonwealth.

Any non-Virginia student who resides outside the Commonwealth and is claimed as a dependent for federal and Virginia income tax purposes if the nonresident parent claiming the student as a dependent has been employed full time in the Commonwealth for at least one year immediately prior to the date of the alleged entitlement and paid Virginia income taxes on all taxable income earned in the Commonwealth for the tax year prior to the date of the alleged entitlement. Such student shall continue to be eligible for in-state tuition charges for so long as his qualifying parent is employed full time in the Commonwealth, pays Virginia income taxes on all taxable income earned in the Commonwealth, and claims the student as a dependent for Virginia and federal income tax purposes.

Any active duty member, activated guard or reserve member, or guard or reserve member mobilized or on temporary active orders for 180 days or more who resides in the Commonwealth.

Any veteran who resides in the Commonwealth.

Any surviving spouse who resides in the Commonwealth.

Following completion of active duty service, any non-Virginia student who established domicile before being called to active duty in the National Guard of another state if during such active duty he maintained at least one of the following in the Commonwealth: a driver’s license, motor vehicle registration, voter registration, employment, property ownership, or sources of financial support.

Any member of the foreign service office who resided in the Commonwealth for at least 90 days immediately prior to receiving a foreign service assignment and who continues to be assigned overseas, and any dependents of such member.

Any child of an active duty member or veteran who claims Virginia as his home state and filed Virginia tax returns for at least 10 years during active duty service.

Any individual who (i) was admitted to the United States as a refugee under 8 U.S.C. § 1157 within the previous two calendar years or (ii) received a Special Immigrant Visa that has been granted a status under P.L. 110-181 § 1244, P.L. 109-163 § 1059, or P.L. 111-8 § 602 within the previous two calendar years and, upon entering the United States, resided in the Commonwealth and continues to reside in the Commonwealth as a refugee or pursuant to such Special Immigrant Visa.

Any non-Virginia student who is currently present in the Commonwealth as a result of being a victim of human trafficking. For the purposes of this subdivision, a person may be a victim of human trafficking regardless of whether any person has been charged with or convicted of any offense. Eligibility under this subdivision may be proved by a certification of such status as a victim of human trafficking by a federal, state, or local agency or not-for-profit agency, one of whose primary missions is to provide services to victims of human trafficking. For the purposes of this subdivision, “victim of human trafficking” means a victim of (i) a violation of clause (iii), (iv), or (v) of §

18.2-48

; (ii) a felony violation of §

18.2-346

; (iii) a violation of §

18.2-348

,

18.2-349

,

18.2-355

through

18.2-357.1

, or

18.2-368

; or (iv) sex trafficking or severe forms of trafficking in persons as defined in the Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. § 7101 et seq. Public institutions of higher education shall automatically record any student qualifying for in-state tuition pursuant to this subdivision as opting out of making any directory or educational information available to the public unless the student voluntarily and affirmatively chooses to opt in to allowing such directory or educational information to be made available.

Any non-Virginia student granted in-state tuition pursuant to this subsection shall be counted as a Virginia student for the purposes of determining college admissions, enrollment, and tuition and fee revenue policies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

23.1-502

or any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing board of any public institution of higher education may charge in-state tuition to the following students regardless of domicile:

Any non-Virginia student enrolled in one of the institution’s programs designated by the Council who (i) is entitled to reduced tuition charges at the institutions of higher education in any other state that is a party to the Southern Regional Education Compact and that has similar reciprocal provisions for Virginia students and (ii) is domiciled in such other state;

Any non-Virginia student from a foreign country who is enrolled in a foreign exchange program approved by the institution of higher education during the same period in which a Virginia student from such institution is attending such foreign institution as an exchange student; and

Any high school or magnet school student, not otherwise qualified for in-state tuition, who is enrolled in courses specifically designed as part of the high school or magnet school curriculum in a comprehensive community college for which he may, upon successful completion, receive high school and college credit pursuant to a dual enrollment agreement between the high school or magnet school and the comprehensive community college.

Any non-Virginia student granted in-state tuition pursuant to this subsection shall be counted as a non-Virginia student for the purposes of determining college admissions, enrollment, and tuition and fee revenue policies.

The State Board shall charge in-state tuition to any non-Virginia student enrolled at a comprehensive community college who resides in another state within a 30-mile radius of a public institution of higher education in the Commonwealth, is domiciled in such other state, and is entitled to in-state tuition charges at the institutions of higher education in any state that is contiguous to the Commonwealth and that has similar reciprocal provisions for Virginia students.

Any non-Virginia student granted in-state tuition pursuant to this subsection shall be counted as a Virginia student for the purposes of determining college admissions, enrollment, and tuition and fee revenue policies.

History.

2022, c. 795.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 187 D, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding
§

23.1-506

, Code of Virginia, the governing board of Old Dominion University may charge reduced tuition to any person enrolled in one of Old Dominion University’s TELETECHNET sites or higher education centers who lives within a 50-mile radius of the site/center, is domiciled in, and is entitled to in-state tuition charges in the institutions of higher learning in any state, or the District of Columbia, which is contiguous to Virginia and which has similar reciprocal provisions for persons domiciled in Virginia.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 329 added subdivision A 7.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 642 added subdivision A 8.

The 2020 amendment by c. 680 added subdivision A 8, which was redesignated as subdivision A 9 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 766 and 767 are identical, and added subdivision A 8, which was redesignated as subdivision A 10 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, and precedes the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 795 added subdivision A 10.

The 2022 amendment by c. 795 added subdivision A 11.

§ 23.1-507.
University of Virginia’s College at Wise; reduced rate tuition charges for certain students.

The board of visitors of the University of Virginia may charge reduced rate tuition to any student enrolled at the University of Virginia’s College at Wise who resides in Kentucky within a 50-mile radius of the University of Virginia’s College at Wise, is domiciled in Kentucky, and is entitled to in-state tuition charges at the institutions of higher education in Kentucky if Kentucky has similar reciprocal provisions for Virginia students.

The board of visitors of the University of Virginia may charge reduced rate tuition to any student enrolled at the University of Virginia’s College at Wise who resides in Tennessee within a 50-mile radius of the University of Virginia’s College at Wise, is domiciled in Tennessee, and is entitled to in-state tuition charges at the institutions of higher education in Tennessee if Tennessee has similar reciprocal provisions for Virginia students.

The board of visitors of the University of Virginia may charge reduced rate tuition to any student enrolled at the University of Virginia’s College at Wise who resides in the Appalachian Region as defined in 40 U.S.C. § 14102, is domiciled within the Appalachian Region, and is entitled to in-state tuition charges at a public institution of higher education in the Appalachian Region and such entitlement is based on circumstances that when applied to a student who resides in Virginia would result in entitlement to in-state tuition. Reduced rate tuition for students who reside in and are domiciled in the Appalachian Region shall not be set below the in-state tuition rate for Virginia students attending the University of Virginia’s College at Wise.

The board of visitors of the University of Virginia may charge reduced rate tuition to any student enrolled in programs offered jointly by its partners or associates and the University of Virginia’s College at Wise at a regional off-campus center who resides in Tennessee within a 50-mile radius of the University of Virginia’s College at Wise, is domiciled in Tennessee, and is entitled to in-state tuition charges at the institutions of higher education in Tennessee if Tennessee has similar reciprocal provisions for Virginia students. Any such respective partners or associates shall establish separate tuition charges for their independent classes or programs at such regional off-campus centers.

Any non-Virginia student granted reduced rate tuition pursuant to this section shall be counted as a non-Virginia student for the purposes of determining admissions, enrollment, and tuition and fee revenue policies.

History.

1996, cc. 931, 981, § 23-7.4:2; 1998, cc. 62, 79; 1999, cc. 424, 437; 2000, c. 196; 2001, c. 483; 2004, cc. 501, 520; 2006, cc. 783, 797; 2007, cc. 76, 102, 112; 2008, c. 723; 2009, c. 470; 2011, c. 376; 2013, cc. 166, 243, 302; 2014, cc. 341, 762; 2016, c. 588; 2019, cc. 225, 600.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by c. 225, effective March 5, 2019, and c. 600, effective March 18, 2019, are identical, and inserted subsection C and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly.

§ 23.1-508.
Special arrangement contracts; reduced rate tuition charges.

Public institutions of higher education may enter into special arrangement contracts with employers in the Commonwealth or authorities controlling federal installations or agencies located in the Commonwealth for the purpose of providing reduced rate tuition charges for the employees of such employers or authorities who are non-Virginia students at such institutions when such employers or authorities assume the liability for paying, to the extent permitted by federal law, the tuition charges for such employees.

Such special arrangement contracts may be (i) for group instruction in facilities provided by the employer or federal authority or in the institution’s facilities or (ii) on a student-by-student basis for specific employment-related programs.

Special arrangement contracts are valid for a period not to exceed two years and shall be reviewed for legal sufficiency by the Office of the Attorney General prior to signing. All tuition charges agreed to by the public institutions shall be at least equal to in-state tuition and shall be granted only by the institution with which the employer or the federal authorities have a valid contract for students for whom the employer or federal authority is paying the tuition charges.

All special arrangement contracts with authorities controlling federal installations or agencies shall include a specific number of students to be charged reduced tuition rates.

Nothing in this section shall change the domicile of any student for the purposes of enrollment reporting or calculating the proportions of general funds and tuition and fees contributed to the cost of education.

History.

1996, cc. 931, 981, § 23-7.4:2; 1998, cc. 62, 79; 1999, cc. 424, 437; 2000, c. 196; 2001, c. 483; 2004, cc. 501, 520; 2006, cc. 783, 797; 2007, cc. 76, 102, 112; 2008, c. 723; 2009, c. 470; 2011, c. 376; 2013, cc. 166, 243, 302; 2014, cc. 341, 762; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-508.1.
State Board; reduced rate tuition and mandatory fee charges; certain students who are active duty members of Armed Forces of the United States.

The State Board may charge reduced rate tuition and mandatory fees to any student who is (i) an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed outside the Commonwealth; (ii) enrolled in a degree program at a comprehensive community college, provided that any such comprehensive community college that offers online degree programs is a member of the National Council for State Authorization Reciprocity Agreements; and (iii) enrolled in training that leads to a Military Occupational Specialty in the Army or Marine Corps, an Air Force Specialty Code, or a Navy Enlisted Classification.

Any student granted reduced rate tuition pursuant to this section shall be counted as a non-Virginia student for the purposes of determining college admissions and enrollment policies.

History.

2017, c. 782.

§ 23.1-509.
In-state tuition; surcharge.

For the purpose of this section:“Credit hour threshold” means 125 percent of the credit hours needed to satisfy the degree requirements for a specified undergraduate program.“Surcharge” means an amount equal to 100 percent of the average cost of a student’s education at the baccalaureate public institution of higher education that the student attends less tuition and mandatory educational and general fee charges assessed to a Virginia student who has not exceeded the credit hour threshold.

Virginia students who enroll for the first time at baccalaureate public institutions of higher education after August 1, 2006, shall be assessed a surcharge for each semester beginning in which the student continues to be enrolled after such student has reached the credit hour threshold.

In calculating the credit hour threshold, the following courses and credit hours shall be excluded: (i) remedial courses; (ii) transfer credits from another institution of higher education that do not meet degree requirements for general education courses or the student’s chosen program of study; (iii) advanced placement or international baccalaureate credits that were obtained while in high school or another secondary school program; and (iv) dual enrollment, college-level credits obtained by the student prior to receiving a high school diploma.

The relevant baccalaureate public institution of higher education may waive the surcharge in accordance with guidelines and criteria established by the Council, which may include illness, disability, and active service in the Armed Forces of the United States.

History.

1984, c. 422, § 23-7.4; 1985, cc. 179, 572; 1988, c. 124; 1989, c. 371; 1990, c. 680; 1991, c. 590; 1996, cc. 931, 981; 1999, c. 439; 2006, cc. 783, 797, 806; 2007, cc. 108, 491; 2008, c. 723; 2011, cc. 38, 44, 782, 860; 2013, cc. 139, 166, 243; 2014, c. 341; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 12, cl. 1 repealed Acts 1988, c. 124, cl. 2, which had provided that the amendments included in c. 124 would expire on July 1, 1993, and that the law would continue in force as it existed prior to July 1, 1988.

§ 23.1-509.1.
Alternative tuition or fee structures.

Any public institution of higher education may offer alternative tuition or fee structures to students that result in lower costs of attendance, including discounted tuition, flat tuition rates, discounted student fees, or student fee and student services flexibility, to any first-time, incoming freshman undergraduate student who (i) has established domicile, as that term is defined in §

23.1-500

, in the Commonwealth and (ii) enrolls full time with the intent to earn a degree in a program that leads to employment in a high-demand field in the region. Such an alternative tuition or fee structure may be renewed each year if the recipient maintains eligibility for the alternative tuition and fee structure. The State Council of Higher Education for Virginia shall offer guidance, upon request, to any public institution of higher education in establishing an alternative tuition or fee structure pursuant to this section.

History.

2016, c. 523.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, c. 523 amended former § 23-7.4:8, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2016, c. 588, cl. 4, the 2016 amendment by c. 523 has been given effect in this section as set out above. To conform to c. 588, “23.1-500” was substituted for “23-7.4.”

Acts
2016, c. 523, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia (the Council) shall develop recommendations regarding financial incentives and benefits that might be offered to public institutions of higher education that offer alternative tuition or fee structures pursuant to this act. Such incentives and benefits may be related to targeted economic and innovation incentives pursuant to subdivision A 3 of
§ 23-38.87:16 [now
§

23.1-305

A 3] of the Code of Virginia, base adequacy funding, or biennial assessments of institutional performance as set forth in Part 4 of the general appropriation act and
§ 23-9.6:1.01 [now
§

23.1-206

] of the Code of Virginia. The Council shall report its recommendations to the Joint Subcommittee on the Future Competitiveness of Virginia Higher Education no later than November 1, 2016.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2016.